California, session 20252026, AB1807.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:(a) During the summer of 2025, the federal government engaged in large-scale civil immigration enforcement throughout the state. The use of state property for federal immigration enforcement purposes undermines public trust and confidence in state government.(b) The unauthorized use of state resources, property, or personnel to facilitate immigration enforcement actions interferes with the state’s authority over, and its use of, its own resources, property, and personnel.SEC. 2. Chapter 17.28 (commencing with Section 7284.25) is added to Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 17.28. Use of State-Owned Property for Immigration Enforcement7284.25. For purposes of this chapter:(a) “Immigration enforcement” means any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.(b) “Staging area” means an area that is used to assemble, mobilize, and deploy vehicles, equipment, or materials, and related personnel, for the purpose of carrying out immigration enforcement operations.(c) “State-owned property” means real property, buildings, structures, or grounds owned by the state or a state agency, including, but not limited to, a garage, parking lot, state park, and vacant lot.7284.26. (a) State-owned property shall not be used for immigration enforcement purposes. Prohibited uses include, but are not limited to, the following:(1) Staging, assembling, mobilizing, parking, or deploying vehicles, equipment, or personnel for immigration enforcement purposes.(2) Processing, interviewing, temporarily detaining, monitoring and collecting information, or taking custody of individuals for immigration enforcement purposes.(b) This section does not apply to, or interfere with, property that is subject to an existing lease to which the state is a party.(c) This section does not apply to uses of state property by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to implement and maintain procedures in compliance with the Penal Code.7284.27. (a) The Department of General Services, in coordination with state agencies, shall identify all state-owned property that has been used, or is likely to be used, for immigration enforcement purposes, including, but not limited to, as a staging area, processing location, or operations base.(b) For properties identified pursuant to subdivision (a), state agencies shall post clear signage stating the following: “This property is owned by the State of California. It may not be used for immigration enforcement purposes.”(c) State agencies shall ensure that, wherever appropriate, physical barriers, including locked gates, are used to limit access to state-owned property for immigration enforcement purposes, as required pursuant to Section 7284.26.(d) On or before January July 1, 2027, state agencies shall develop procedures to ensure that an attempted or actual use of state-owned property for immigration enforcement purposes is documented in writing, that the documentation includes any photographic or video evidence, and that the Attorney General’s office or the Attorney General’s designee is notified.7284.28. (a) The Attorney General’s office shall design standardized signage for use by an individual seeking to lawfully restrict activities related to immigration enforcement. The Attorney General’s office shall make this signage available to download free of charge on its public internet website.(b) State agencies shall make available educational materials regarding the rights of employees, tenants, and security staff if federal agents enter state-owned property.7284.29. (a) This chapter does not restrict or interfere with the execution of a lawful judicial warrant.(b) The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.